Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2014
Physician assistant, defined.

Physician assistant means any person who graduates from an approved program, who has passed a proficiency examination, and who the department, with the recommendation of the board, approves to perform medical services under a collaborative agreement with the supervision of a physician or under a collaborative agreement with the supervision of a podiatrist as provided by section 38-3013.

Laws 1973, LB 101, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1973, § 85-179.05;

Laws 1985, LB 132, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 316, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 436;

Laws 1996, LB 1108, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 92;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,107.16;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 338;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 672;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 38;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 6.